Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1680YC (1) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 144C.5, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The Except as provided in subsection 4, the right to 3 control final disposition of a decedentâs remains or to make 4 arrangements for the ceremony after a decedentâs death vests 5 in and devolves upon the following persons who are competent 6 adults at the time of the decedentâs death, in the following 7 order: 8 Sec. 2. Section 144C.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The right to control final disposition 11 of a decedentâs remains or to make arrangements for the 12 ceremony after a decedentâs death shall not vest in or devolve 13 upon a person who is prohibited from acting as a designee 14 pursuant to section 144C.8. 15